hr-HR: Oblik oštrice: Zakrivljena oštrica; Ravna; Uski žlijeb; Zaobljeni vrh; Nazubljeni rub; Četvrtasti vrh; Široka zakrivljena oštrica; Ostalo
fr: Forme de la lame: Cuillère incurvée; Plate; Tranchée étroite; Pointe ronde; Bord dentelé; Pointe carrée; Large pelle; Autre
sk-SK: Tvar čepele: Zahnutá lyžicová; Rovný; S úzkym žliabkom; Okrúhly hrot; Zúbkovaný okraj; Hranatý hrot; Široká lyžicová; Iné
pl: Kształt ostrza: Zakrzywiona łyżka; Płaskie; Wąski rowek; Zaokrąglony czubek; Ząbkowana krawędź; Kwadratowy czubek; Szeroka łyżka; Pozostałe
ru: Форма лезвия: Изогнутый ковш; Плоское; Узкая траншея; Остроконечное; Зазубренный край; Квадратное; Широкий черпак; Другое
pt-BR: Formato da lâmina: Concha curva; Plano; Sulco estreito; Ponta arredondada; Borda serrilhada; Ponta chata; Concha larga; Outro
es: Forma de la cuchilla: Cuchara curva; Plana; Zanja estrecha; Punta redondeada; Borde dentado; Punta cuadrada; Pala ancha; Otros
ro-RO: Forma lamei: Lopată curbată; Plat; Șanț îngust; Cu vârf rotund; Margine zimțată; Cu vârf pătrat; Cupă largă; Altele
en: Blade shape: Curved scoop; Flat; Narrow trench; Round point; Serrated edge; Square point; Wide scoop; Other
vi: Hình dạng lưỡi dao: Lòng xúc cong; Phẳng; Rãnh hẹp; Đầu tròn; Cạnh răng cưa; Đầu vuông; Lòng xúc rộng; Khác
zh-TW: 刀片形狀: 弧形抹刀; 平刃; 狹溝; 圓頭; 鋸齒邊; 方頭; 寬抹刀; 其他
hu: Penge formája: Ívelt kanál; Lapos; Keskeny vájat; Kerek hegyű; Fogazott él; Szögletes hegyű; Széles kanál; Egyéb
lt-LT: Ašmenų forma: Išlenktas kaušas; Plokščias; Siaura tranšėja; Apvalus smaigalys; Dantytas kraštas; Kvadratinis smaigalys; Platus kaušas; Kita
it: Forma della pala: Curva a cucchiaio; Piatto; Per scanalature strette; Punta arrotondata; Bordo seghettato; Punta squadrata; Larga; Altro
th: รูปทรงใบพลั่ว: ใบมีดโค้ง; แบบแบน; ใบมีดร่องแคบ; ปลายกลม; ใบมีดคมเป็นฟันเลื่อย; ปลายเหลี่ยม; ใบมีดกว้าง; อื่นๆ
tr: Bıçak şekli: Kavisli ağız; Mat; Dar oluk; Yuvarlak uç; Tırtıklı kenar; Kare uçlu; Geniş ağız; Diğer
el: Σχήμα λεπίδας: Καμπύλη σκαφωτή λεπίδα; Επίπεδη; Στενή αυλακωτή λεπίδα; Στρογγυλεμένη άκρη; Οδοντωτή κόψη; Τετράγωνη άκρη; Φαρδιά σκαφωτή λεπίδα; Άλλο
de: Klingenform: Gebogenes Klingenblatt; Flach; Schmales Klingenblatt; Runde Spitze; Wellenschliff; Quadratische Spitze; Breites Klingenblatt; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Форма на острието: Извито; Плоско; Тясно; Заоблен връх; Назъбен ръб; Квадратен връх; Широко; Друго
nb: Bladets form: Buet øse; Flat; Smal grøft; Rund tupp; Tagget kant; Kvadratisk tupp; Bredt skje; Annet
da: Bladform: Buet skovl; Flad; Smal rende; Rund spids; Takket kant; Firkantet spids; Bred skovl; Andet
sv: Bladets form: Skedblad; Platt; Smal trench; Rundad spets; Räfflad kant; Rak spets; Bred skopa; Övrigt
pt-PT: Forma da lâmina: Concha curva; Lisa; Sulco estreito; Ponta arredondada; Borda serrilhada; Ponta quadrada; Cavidade larga; Outro
nl: Vormen: Gebogen schep; Vlak; Smalle sleuf; Ronde punt; Gekartelde rand; Vierkante punt; Brede schep; Overig
fi: Terän muoto: Kaareva terä; Tasainen; Kapea terä; Pyöreä kärki; Sahalaitainen terä; Neliökärki; Leveä terä; Muu
zh-CN: 刀片形状: 弧形宽铲; 平头; 窄沟铲; 圆头; 锯齿刃; 方头; 宽头铲; 其他
ja: ブレードの形状: 湾曲スクープ; フラット; 狭いトレンチ; ラウンド; 鋸歯エッジ; スクエア; ワイドスクープ; その他
ko: 삽날 형태: 곡선형 스쿱; 플랫; 내로 트렌치; 끝이 둥근 형태; 톱니 모양의 날; 끝이 각진 형태; 와이드 스쿱; 기타
cs: Tvar čepele: Lžičková; Ploché; Úzká zákopová; Zaoblená špička; Zoubkovaná; Hranatá špička; Široká lžičková; Jiné
sl-SI: Oblika rezila: Ukrivljena zajemalka; Ploščata; Ozek jarek; Okrogla točka; Nazobčan rob; Kvadratna točka; Široka zajemalka; Druga